District of Columbia statutes.
5-116.33

Body-Worn Camera Program; reporting requirements.

(a)

By October 1, 2015, and every 6 months thereafter, the Mayor shall collect, and make available in a publicly accessible format, data on the Metropolitan Police Department’s Body-Worn Camera Program, including:

(1)

How many hours of body-worn camera recordings were collected;

(2)

How many times body-worn cameras failed while officers were on shift and the reasons for the failures;

(3)

How many times internal investigations were opened for a failure to turn on body-worn cameras during interactions;

(4)

How many times body-worn camera recordings were used by the Metropolitan Police Department in internal affairs investigations;

(5)

How many times body-worn camera recordings were used by the Metropolitan Police Department to investigate complaints made by an individual or group;

(6)

How many body-worn cameras are assigned to each police district and police unit for the reporting period;

(7)

How many Freedom of Information Act requests the Metropolitan Police Department received for body-worn camera recordings during the reporting period, the outcome of each request, including any reasons for denial, and the cost to the department for complying with each request, including redaction; and

(8)

How many recordings were assigned to each body-worn camera recording category.

(b)

The Metropolitan Police Department shall provide the Office of Police Complaints with direct access to body-worn camera recordings.

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 3004, 62 DCR 10905
Mar. 9, 2016, D.C. Law 21-83, § 3, 63 DCR 774
The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-83 rewrote (a)(7); and added (a)(8) and made a related change.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 3004 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3 of the Body-Worn Camera Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-253, Dec. 30, 2015, 63 DCR 271).